Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201854-705
Prevention of
diseases; orders of department; enforcement.

The
Department of Agriculture or any officer, agent, employee, or appointee thereof
may call upon any sheriff, deputy sheriff, or other police officer to execute
the orders of the department, and the officer shall obey the orders of the
department. The officers performing such duties shall receive compensation
therefor as is prescribed by law for like services and shall be paid therefor
by the county. Any officer may arrest and take before the county judge of
the county any person found violating any of the provisions of the Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange
Venue Act and sections 54-701 to 54-753.05, and such officer shall immediately notify
the county attorney of such arrest. The county attorney shall prosecute the
person so offending according to law.

Laws 1927, c. 12, art. I, § 5, p. 82;

C.S.1929, § 54-905;

R.S.1943, § 54-705;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 261;

Laws 1988, LB 1030, § 45;

Laws 1993, LB 267, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 438, § 6;

Laws 2006, LB 856, § 20;

Laws 2014, LB884, § 8.

Exotic Animal Auction or Exchange Venue Act, see section 54-7,105.